Illinois, session 104th, HB5446.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Section 3.85 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 50/3.85)7    Sec. 3.85. Vehicle Service Providers. 8    (a) "Vehicle Service Provider" means an entity licensed by 9the Department to provide emergency or non-emergency medical 10services in compliance with this Act, the rules promulgated by 11the Department pursuant to this Act, and an operational plan 12approved by its EMS System(s), utilizing at least ambulances 13or specialized emergency medical service vehicles (SEMSV).14        (1) "Ambulance" means any publicly or privately owned 15    on-road vehicle that is specifically designed, constructed 16    or modified and equipped, and is intended to be used for, 17    and is maintained or operated for the emergency 18    transportation of persons who are sick, injured, wounded 19    or otherwise incapacitated or helpless, or the 20    non-emergency medical transportation of persons who 21    require the presence of medical personnel to monitor the 22    individual's condition or medical apparatus being used on 23    such individuals.  HB5446 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        (2) "Specialized Emergency Medical Services Vehicle" 2    or "SEMSV" means a vehicle or conveyance, other than those 3    owned or operated by the federal government, that is 4    primarily intended for use in transporting the sick or 5    injured by means of air, water, or ground transportation, 6    that is not an ambulance as defined in this Act. The term 7    includes watercraft, aircraft and special purpose ground 8    transport vehicles or conveyances not intended for use on 9    public roads.10        (3) An ambulance or SEMSV may also be designated as a 11    Limited Operation Vehicle or Special-Use Vehicle:12            (A) "Limited Operation Vehicle" means a vehicle 13        which is licensed by the Department to provide basic, 14        intermediate or advanced life support emergency or 15        non-emergency medical services that are exclusively 16        limited to specific events or locales.17            (B) "Special-Use Vehicle" means any publicly or 18        privately owned vehicle that is specifically designed, 19        constructed or modified and equipped, and is intended 20        to be used for, and is maintained or operated solely 21        for the emergency or non-emergency transportation of a 22        specific medical class or category of persons who are 23        sick, injured, wounded or otherwise incapacitated or 24        helpless (e.g. high-risk obstetrical patients, 25        neonatal patients).26            (C) "Reserve Ambulance" means a vehicle that meets   HB5446 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        all criteria set forth in this Section and all 2        Department rules, except for the required inventory of 3        medical supplies and durable medical equipment, which 4        may be rapidly transferred from a fully functional 5        ambulance to a reserve ambulance without the use of 6        tools or special mechanical expertise. 7    (b) The Department shall have the authority and 8responsibility to:9        (1) Require all Vehicle Service Providers, both 10    publicly and privately owned, to function within an EMS 11    System.12        (2) Require a Vehicle Service Provider utilizing 13    ambulances to have a primary affiliation with an EMS 14    System within the EMS Region in which its Primary Service 15    Area is located, which is the geographic areas in which 16    the provider renders the majority of its emergency 17    responses. This requirement shall not apply to Vehicle 18    Service Providers which exclusively utilize Limited 19    Operation Vehicles.20        (3) Establish licensing standards and requirements for 21    Vehicle Service Providers, through rules adopted pursuant 22    to this Act, including but not limited to:23            (A) Vehicle design, specification, operation and 24        maintenance standards, including standards for the use 25        of reserve ambulances;26            (B) Equipment requirements;  HB5446 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1            (C) Staffing requirements; and2            (D) License renewal at intervals determined by the 3        Department, which shall be not less than every 4 4        years.5        The Department's standards and requirements with 6    respect to vehicle staffing for private, nonpublic local 7    government employers must allow for alternative staffing 8    models that include an EMR with a licensed EMT, EMT-I, 9    A-EMT, Paramedic, or PHRN, as appropriate, pursuant to the 10    approval of the EMS System Program Plan developed and 11    approved by the EMS Medical Director for an EMS System. 12    The EMS personnel licensed at the highest level shall 13    provide the initial assessment of the patient to determine 14    the level of care required for transport to the receiving 15    health care facility, and this assessment shall be 16    documented in the patient care report and documented with 17    online medical control. The EMS personnel licensed at or 18    above the level of care required by the specific patient 19    as directed by the EMS Medical Director shall be the 20    primary care provider en route to the destination facility 21    or patient's residence. The Department shall monitor the 22    implementation and performance of alternative staffing 23    models and may issue a notice of termination of an 24    alternative staffing model only upon evidence that an EMS 25    System Program Plan is not being adhered to. Adoption of 26    an alternative staffing model shall not result in a   HB5446 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1    Vehicle Service Provider being prohibited or limited in 2    the utilization of its staff or equipment from providing 3    any of the services authorized by this Act or as otherwise 4    outlined in the approved EMS System Program Plan, 5    including, without limitation, the deployment of resources 6    to provide out-of-state disaster response. EMS System 7    Program Plans must address a process for out-of-state 8    disaster response deployments that must meet the 9    following:10            (A) All deployments to provide out-of-state 11        disaster response must first be approved by the EMS 12        Medical Director and submitted to the Department.13            (B) The submission must include the number of 14        units being deployed, vehicle identification numbers, 15        length of deployment, and names of personnel and their 16        licensure level.17            (C) Ensure that all necessary in-state requests 18        for services will be covered during the duration of 19        the deployment. 20        An EMS System Program Plan for a Basic Life Support, 21    advanced life support, and critical care transport 22    utilizing an EMR and an EMT shall include the following:23            (A) Alternative staffing models for a Basic Life 24        Support transport utilizing an EMR shall only be 25        utilized for interfacility Basic Life Support 26        transports as specified by the EMS System Program Plan   HB5446 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        as determined by the EMS System Medical Director.2            (B) Protocols that shall include dispatch 3        procedures to properly screen and assess patients for 4        EMR-staffed transports.5            (C) A requirement that a provider and EMS System 6        shall implement a quality assurance plan that shall 7        include for the initial waiver period the review of at 8        least 5% of total interfacility transports utilizing 9        an EMR with mechanisms outlined to audit dispatch 10        screening, reason for transport, patient diagnosis, 11        level of care, and the outcome of transports 12        performed. Quality assurance reports must be submitted 13        and reviewed by the provider and EMS System monthly 14        and made available to the Department upon request. The 15        percentage of transports reviewed under quality 16        assurance plans for renewal periods shall be 17        determined by the EMS Medical Director, however, it 18        shall not be less than 3%. 19            (D) The EMS System Medical Director shall develop 20        a minimum set of requirements for individuals based on 21        level of licensure that includes education, training, 22        and credentialing for all team members identified to 23        participate in an alternative staffing plan. The EMT, 24        Paramedic, PHRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, and critical care 25        transport staff shall have the minimum experience in 26        performance of pre-hospital and inter-hospital care,   HB5446 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        as determined by the EMS Medical Director in 2        accordance with the EMS System Program Plan, but at a 3        minimum of 6 months of prehospital experience or at 4        least 50 documented patient care interventions during 5        transport as the primary care provider and approved by 6        the Department.7            (E) The licensed EMR must complete a defensive 8        driving course prior to participation in the 9        Department's alternative staffing model.10            (F) The length of the EMS System Program Plan for a 11        Basic Life Support transport utilizing an EMR shall be 12        for one year, and must be renewed annually if proof of 13        the criteria being met is submitted, validated, and 14        approved by the EMS Medical Director for the EMS 15        System and the Department.16            (G) Beginning July 1, 2023, the utilization of 17        EMRs for advanced life support transports and Tier III 18        Critical Care Transports shall be allowed for periods 19        not to exceed 3 years under a pilot program. The pilot 20        program shall not be implemented before Department 21        approval. Agencies requesting to utilize this staffing 22        model for the time period of the pilot program must 23        complete the following:24                (i) Submit a waiver request to the Department 25            requesting to participate in the pilot program 26            with specific details of how quality assurance and   HB5446 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1            improvement will be gathered, measured, reported 2            to the Department, and reviewed and utilized 3            internally by the participating agency.4                (ii) Submit a signed approval letter from the 5            EMS System Medical Director approving 6            participation in the pilot program.7                (iii) Submit updated EMS System plans, 8            additional education, and training of the EMR and 9            protocols related to the pilot program.10                (iv) Submit agency policies and procedures 11            related to the pilot program.12                (v) Submit the number of individuals currently 13            participating and committed to participating in 14            education programs to achieve a higher level of 15            licensure at the time of submission.16                (vi) Submit an explanation of how the provider 17            will support individuals obtaining a higher level 18            of licensure and encourage a higher level of 19            licensure during the year of the alternative 20            staffing plan and specific examples of recruitment 21            and retention activities or initiatives.22            Upon submission of a renewal application and 23        recruitment and retention plan, the provider shall 24        include additional data regarding current employment 25        numbers, attrition rates over the year, and activities 26        and initiatives over the previous year to address   HB5446 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        recruitment and retention.2            The information required under this subparagraph 3        (G) shall be provided to and retained by the EMS System 4        upon initial application and renewal and shall be 5        provided to the Department upon request. 6        The Department must allow for an alternative rural 7    staffing model for those vehicle service providers that 8    serve a rural or semi-rural population of 10,000 or fewer 9    inhabitants and exclusively uses volunteers, paid-on-call, 10    or part-time employees, or a combination thereof. The 11    changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12    Assembly do not apply to employees covered by a collective 13    bargaining agreement.14        (4) License all Vehicle Service Providers that have 15    met the Department's requirements for licensure, unless 16    such Provider is owned or licensed by the federal 17    government. All Provider licenses issued by the Department 18    shall specify the level and type of each vehicle covered 19    by the license (BLS, ILS, ALS, ambulance, critical care 20    transport, SEMSV, limited operation vehicle, special use 21    vehicle, reserve ambulance).22        (5) Annually inspect all licensed vehicles operated by 23    Vehicle Service Providers.24        (6) Suspend, revoke, refuse to issue or refuse to 25    renew the license of any Vehicle Service Provider, or that 26    portion of a license pertaining to a specific vehicle   HB5446 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1    operated by the Provider, after an opportunity for a 2    hearing, when findings show that the Provider or one or 3    more of its vehicles has failed to comply with the 4    standards and requirements of this Act or rules adopted by 5    the Department pursuant to this Act.6        (7) Issue an Emergency Suspension Order for any 7    Provider or vehicle licensed under this Act, when the 8    Director or his designee has determined that an immediate 9    and serious danger to the public health, safety and 10    welfare exists. Suspension or revocation proceedings which 11    offer an opportunity for hearing shall be promptly 12    initiated after the Emergency Suspension Order has been 13    issued.14        (8) Exempt any licensed vehicle from subsequent 15    vehicle design standards or specifications required by the 16    Department, as long as said vehicle is continuously in 17    compliance with the vehicle design standards and 18    specifications originally applicable to that vehicle, or 19    until said vehicle's title of ownership is transferred.20        (9) Exempt any vehicle (except an SEMSV) which was 21    being used as an ambulance on or before December 15, 1980, 22    from vehicle design standards and specifications required 23    by the Department, until said vehicle's title of ownership 24    is transferred. Such vehicles shall not be exempt from all 25    other licensing standards and requirements prescribed by 26    the Department.  HB5446 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        (10) Prohibit any Vehicle Service Provider from 2    advertising, identifying its vehicles, or disseminating 3    information in a false or misleading manner concerning the 4    Provider's type and level of vehicles, location, primary 5    service area, response times, level of personnel, 6    licensure status or System participation.7        (10.5) Prohibit any Vehicle Service Provider, whether 8    municipal, private, or hospital-owned, from advertising 9    itself as a critical care transport provider unless it 10    participates in a Department-approved EMS System critical 11    care transport plan. 12        (11) Charge each Vehicle Service Provider a fee per 13    transport vehicle, due annually at time of inspection. The 14    fee per transport vehicle shall be set by administrative 15    rule by the Department and shall not exceed 100 vehicles 16    per provider.17        (12) Beginning July 1, 2023, as part of a pilot 18    program that shall not exceed a term of 3 years, an 19    ambulance may be upgraded to a higher level of care for 20    interfacility transports by an ambulance assistance 21    vehicle with appropriate equipment and licensed personnel 22    to intercept with the licensed ambulance at the sending 23    facility before departure. The pilot program shall not be 24    implemented before Department approval. To participate in 25    the pilot program, an agency must:26            (A) Submit a waiver request to the Department with   HB5446 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17942 BAB 31379 b1        intercept vehicle vehicle identification numbers, 2        calls signs, equipment detail, and a robust quality 3        assurance plan that shall list, at minimum, detailed 4        reasons each intercept had to be completed, barriers 5        to initial dispatch of advanced life support services, 6        and how this benefited the patient.7            (B) Report to the Department quarterly additional 8        data deemed meaningful by the providing agency along 9        with the data required under subparagraph (A) of this 10        paragraph (12).11            (C) Obtain a signed letter of approval from the 12        EMS Medical Director allowing for participation in the 13        pilot program.14            (D) Update EMS System plans and protocols from the 15        pilot program.16            (E) Update policies and procedures from the 17        agencies participating in the pilot program. 18(Source: P.A. 102-623, eff. 8-27-21; 103-547, eff. 8-11-23.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.